Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1399XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1399XD (1) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 904.301, Code 2025, is amended to read
as follows:
904.301 Appointment of superintendents.
1. The director shall appoint, subject to the approval
advice and recommendations of the board, the superintendents of
the institutions provided for in section 904.102.
2. The superintendent has the immediate custody and
control, subject to the orders and policies of the director,
of all property used in connection with the institution except
as otherwise provided by statute. The tenure of office of
a superintendent shall be at the pleasure of the appointing
authority but a superintendent may be removed for inability or
refusal to properly perform the duties of the office. Removal
shall occur only after an opportunity is given the person to
be heard before the board and the director and upon preferred
written charges. The removal when made is final.
Sec. 2. Section 904.301A, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
904.301A Appointment of directors.
1. The director shall appoint, subject to the approval
advice and recommendations of the board, a district director
for each district department established in section 904.104A.
2. The district director has the immediate custody and
control, subject to the orders and policies of the director, of
all property used in connection with the district department
except as otherwise provided by statute. The tenure of
office of a district director shall be at the pleasure of the
appointing authority but a district director may be removed
for inability or refusal to properly perform the duties of the
office.
Sec. 3. Section 904.317, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The director, subject to the approval advice and
recommendations of the board, may secure options to purchase
real estate and acquire and sell real estate for the proper
LSB 1399XD (1) 91
-1- as/js 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
uses of the institutions. Real estate shall be acquired and
sold upon terms and conditions the director recommends subject
to the approval of the board. Upon sale of the real estate,
the proceeds shall be deposited in a corrections capital
reinvestment fund, which is established in the state treasury
under the purview of the department. There is appropriated
from the fund to the department the proceeds, which may be used
to purchase other real estate or for capital improvements upon
property under the director’s supervision. Notwithstanding
section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or
unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert
but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes
designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2,
interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited
to the fund.